North Carolina, session 2025, HB1134.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-202, as amended by S.L. 2025-70, reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-202. Secretly peeping into room occupied by another person.
(a) Any Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who shall peep
secretly into any room occupied by another person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any
person who commits a violation of this subsection in which the victim is a minor shall be guilty
of a Class A1 misdemeanor.
(a1) Unless covered by another provision of law providing greater punishment, any person
who secretly or surreptitiously peeps underneath or through the clothing being worn by another
person, through the use of a mirror or other device, for the purpose of viewing the body of, or the
undergarments worn by, that other person without their consent shall be guilty of a Class 1
misdemeanor. Any person who commits a violation of this subsection in which the victim is a
minor shall be guilty of a Class A1 misdemeanor.
(b) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Minor. – An individual who is less than 18 years of age.
(2) Photographic image. – Any photograph or photographic reproduction, still or
moving, or any videotape, motion picture, or live television transmission, or
any digital image of any individual.
(2)(3) Private area of an individual. – The naked or undergarment clad genitals,
pubic area, buttocks, or female breast of that individual.
(3)(4) Room. – Includes, but is not limited to, a bedroom, a rest room, a bathroom, a
shower, a dressing room, a dressing stall, a cubicle, or other similar area
designed to provide privacy.
(4)(5) Under circumstances in which that individual has a reasonable expectation of
privacy. – Means either of the following:
a. Circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that he or
she could disrobe in privacy, without being concerned that a
photographic image of a private area of the individual was being
created.
*H1134-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that a
private area of the individual would not be visible to the public,
regardless of whether that person is in a public or private place.
(c) Unless covered by another provision of law providing greater punishment, any person
who, while in possession of any device which may be used to create a photographic image and
with the intent to create a photographic image, shall secretly peep into any room shall be guilty
of a Class A1 misdemeanor. Any person who commits a violation of this subsection in which the
victim is a minor shall be guilty of a Class I felony.
(d) Unless covered by another provision of law providing greater punishment, any person
who, while secretly peeping into any room, uses any device to create a photographic image of
another person in that room for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any
person shall be guilty of a Class I felony. Any person who commits a violation of this subsection
in which the victim is a minor shall be guilty of a Class H felony.
(e1) Unless covered under some other provision of law providing greater punishment, any
person who, with the intent to create a photographic image of a private area of an individual
without the individual's consent, knowingly does so under circumstances in which the individual
has a reasonable expectation of privacy shall be guilty of a Class I felony. Any person who
commits a violation of this subsection in which the victim is a minor shall be guilty of a Class H
felony.
(f) Any Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who, for the purpose
of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person, secretly or surreptitiously uses or installs
in a room any device that can be used to create a photographic image with the intent to capture
the image of another without their consent shall be guilty of a Class I felony. Any person who
commits a violation of this subsection in which the victim is a minor shall be guilty of a Class H
felony.
(g) Any Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who knowingly
possesses a photographic image that the person knows, or has reason to believe, was obtained in
violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class I felony. Any person who commits a violation
of this subsection in which the victim is a minor shall be guilty of a Class H felony.
(h) Any Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who disseminates or
allows to be disseminated images that the person knows, or should have known, were obtained
as a result of the violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class H felony if the dissemination
is without the consent of the person in the photographic image. Any person who commits a
violation of this subsection in which the victim is a minor shall be guilty of a Class G felony.
…."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds to be used
for costs incurred by the Department from developing and implementing a marketing campaign
to make the public aware of G.S. 14-202, as amended by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies
to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this act becomes effective July 1,
2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1134-First Edition